Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.04.030

State criminal jurisdiction.

The following persons are liable to punishment:

(1) A person who commits in the state any crime, in whole or in part.

(2) A person who commits out of the state any act which, if committed within it, would be theft and is afterward found in the state with any of the stolen property.

(3) A person who being out of the state, counsels, causes, procures, aids, or abets another to commit a crime in this state.

(4) A person who, being out of the state, abducts or kidnaps by force or fraud, any person, contrary to the laws of the place where the act is committed, and brings, sends, or conveys such person into this state.

(5) A person who commits an act without the state which affects persons or property within the state, which, if committed within the state, would be a crime.

(6) A person who, being out of the state, makes a statement, declaration, verification, or certificate under chapter 5.50 RCW which, if made within the state, would be perjury.

(7) A person who commits an act onboard a conveyance within the state of Washington, including the airspace over the state of Washington, that subsequently lands, docks, or stops within the state which, if committed within the state, would be a crime.

[ 2019 c 232 s 9; 1999 c 349 s 1; 1981 c 187 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.04.030.]